Massachusetts, session 194th, S1802.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“COVID-19 essential employee retirement credit bonus” or “COVID-19 credit”,
equivalent to the duration of the Governor’s Covid-19 State of Emergency March 10, 2020 –
June 15, 2021, added to an employee’s age or years of service or a combination thereof that can
be used at retirement for the purpose of calculating a retirement benefit pursuant to Chapter 32.
“Essential employee”, All state, county and municipal public health and safety officials
including Police, Fire, and EMS, court officers, corrections officers and public health officials
who provided direct patient care or supervision
of 3

(b), The secretary of administration and finance shall identify all essential employees of
the commonwealth who, during the period covered by the governor’s state of emergency
declared on March 10, 2020 until its recission, were: (ii) required to work at their respective
worksite or any other worksite outside of their personal residence; and (iii) public facing.
(c) The secretary shall work with the appropriate heads of departments of the
commonwealth to identify and provide a list of essential employees and their home mailing
address to the state retirement board documenting the employees’ eligibility for the COVID-19
essential employee retirement credit bonus. Upon identification of eligible essential employees,
such employees shall be credited with a COVID-19 credit as defined in Section 1 (a). The state
retirement board shall notify each eligible essential employee in writing of their receipt of the
credit.
SECTION 2 - A municipality may elect to adopt the COVID-19 essential employee
retirement credit in Section 1 .This section shall take effect in a municipality upon its acceptance
in the following manner: in a city, by vote of its city council in accordance with its city charter,
in a town, whether it maintains its own contributory retirement system or its employees are
members of a county or regional retirement system, by vote of the town meeting, in a district,
whether it maintains its own contributory retirement system or its employees are members of a
county or regional retirement system, by vote of the district meeting, and in the case of an
authority, the governing body. For the purposes of this section, the state employees' retirement
system shall be deemed to have accepted the provisions of this section.
SECTION3. Upon Local Acceptance of this Act the chief executive for a municipality
shall identify all essential employees eligible for the COVID -19 credit pursuant to Section 1a.
of 3

Upon identification of eligible essential employees, such employees shall be credited with a
COVID-19 credit as defined in Section 1 (a). The retirement board of which the municipality’s
employees are members shall notify each eligible employee in writing of their receipt of the
credit.
SECTION 4. The chief executive officer for a quasi-public agency whose Chapter 32
retirement board has accepted the COVID-19 credit pursuant to Section 2 shall work with
agency’s director of human resources to identify employees eligible for the COVID - credit
pursuant to Section 1. Upon identification of eligible employees, such employees shall be
credited with a COVID-19 credit as defined in Section 1 (a). The retirement board of which the
agency’s employees are members shall notify each eligible employee in writing of their receipt
of the credit.
of 3